West Virginia, session 2026, HB4669.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1D. safe drinking water act. §16-1D-1. Prohibition of fluoride in public water systems. (a) As used in this section, "fluoride" means a chemical compound that contains the fluoride ion and is used to fluoridate drinking water, including:(1) Fluorosilicic acid;(2) Sodium fluorosilicate; or(3) Sodium fluoride.(b) A person may not add fluoride to water in, or water that will be introduced into, a public water system.(c) A political subdivision may not enact or enforce an ordinance that requires or permits the addition of fluoride to water in, or water that will be introduced into, a public water system.(d) This article shall be known and cited as the "Safe Drinking Water Act."